Massachusetts, session 194th, H2155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:-
(f) An employer with not more than twenty-five employees shall be permitted to submit
a private plan subject to the requirements of subsection (a)(1) of this section to the department
directly; provided further, said employer shall be exempt from the requirements set forth in
subsection (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(iii) of this section.
of 1